California statutes. Penal Code
 court, or justice or judge thereof, the order denying the writ shall remand the accused to custody, and fix a reasonable time within which the accused may again apply for a writ of habeas corpus. When an application is made for a writ of habeas corpus as contemplated by this section, a copy of the application shall be served as provided in Section 1475, upon the district attorney of the county in which the accused is in custody, and upon the agent of the demanding state. A warrant issued in accordance with the provisions of Section 1549.2 shall be presumed to be valid, and unless a court finds that the person in custody is not the same person named in the warrant, or that the person is not a fugitive from justice, or otherwise subject to extradition under Section 1549.1, or that there is no criminal charge or criminal proceeding pending against the person in the demanding state, or that the documents are not on their face in order, the person named in the warrant shall be held in custody at all times, and
 shall not be eligible for release on bail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1550.2.

Any officer or other person entrusted with a Governor’s warrant who delivers to the agent of the demanding State a person in his custody under such Governor’s warrant, in wilful disobedience to the preceding section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $1,000 or be imprisoned not more than six months, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1550.3.

The officer or persons executing the Governor’s warrant of arrest, or the agent of the demanding State to whom the prisoner has been delivered may confine the prisoner in the jail of any county or city through which he may pass. The keeper of such jail must receive and safely keep the prisoner until the officer or person having charge of him is ready to proceed on his route. Such officer or person shall be charged with the expense of keeping the prisoner.

The officer or agent of a demanding State to whom a prisoner has been delivered following extradition proceedings in another State, or to whom a prisoner has been delivered after
 waiving extradition in such other State, and who is passing through this State with such a prisoner for the purpose of immediately returning such prisoner to the demanding State may confine the prisoner in the jail of any county or city through which he may pass. The keeper of such jail must receive and safely keep the prisoner until the officer or agent having charge of him is ready to proceed on his route. Such officer or agent shall be charged with the expense of keeping the prisoner. Such officer or agent shall produce and show to the keeper of such jail satisfactory written evidence of the fact that he is actually transporting such prisoner to the demanding State after a requisition by the executive authority thereof. Such prisoner shall not be entitled to demand a new requisition while in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1551.

(a) Whenever any person within this State is charged by a verified complaint before any magistrate of this State with the commission of any crime in any other State, or, with having been convicted of a crime in that State and having escaped from confinement, or having violated the terms of their bail, probation or parole or whenever complaint is made before any magistrate in this State setting forth on the affidavit of any credible person in another State that a crime has been committed in such other State and that the accused has been charged in such State with the commission of the crime, or that the accused has been convicted of a crime in that State and has escaped from bail, probation or parole and is believed to be in this State; then the magistrate shall issue a warrant directed to
 any peace officer commanding the officer to apprehend the person named therein, wherever the individual may be found in this State, and to bring them before the same or any other magistrate who is available in or convenient of access to the place where the arrest is made. A certified copy of the sworn charge or complaint and affidavit upon which the warrant is issued shall be attached to the warrant.

(b) Within 24 hours of the filing of any verified complaint pursuant to this section, the filing agency shall transmit electronically to the Attorney General a complete copy of the verified complaint, the out-of-state indictment, information, complaint, or judgment, out-of-state warrant, and the affidavit upon which the out-of-state warrant was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 627, Sec. 10.   (AB 1242)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1551.05.

(a) Any person on outpatient status pursuant to Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2 or pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2972 who leaves this state without complying with Section 1611, or who fails to return to this state on the date specified by the committing court, shall be subject to extradition in accordance with this section.

(b) If the return to this state is required by a person who is subject to extradition pursuant to subdivision (a), the Director of State Hospitals shall present to the Governor a written application for requisition for the return of that person. In the requisition application there shall be stated the name of the person, the type of judicial commitment the person is under, the nature of the underlying criminal act which was the basis for the judicial commitment, the circumstances of the noncompliance with Section 1611, and the state in which the person is believed to be, including the specific location of the person, if known.

(c) The application shall be verified, shall be executed in duplicate, and shall be accompanied by two certified copies of the court order of judicial commitment and of the court order authorizing outpatient status. The director may also attach any affidavits or other documents in duplicate as are deemed
 proper to be submitted with the application. One copy of the application, with the action of the Governor indicated by endorsement thereon, and one copy of the court orders shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. The other copies of all papers shall be forwarded with the Governor’s requisition.

(d) Upon receipt of an application under this section, the Governor or agent authorized in writing by the Governor whose authorization has been filed with the Secretary of State, may sign a requisition for the return of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 37.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1551.1.

The arrest of a person may also be lawfully made by any peace officer, without a warrant, upon reasonable information that the accused stands charged in the courts of any other state with a crime punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, or that the person has been convicted of a crime punishable in the state of conviction by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year and thereafter escaped from confinement or violated the terms of his or her bail, probation or parole. When so arrested the accused shall be taken before a magistrate with all practicable speed and complaint shall be made against him or her under oath setting
 forth the ground for the arrest as in Section 1551.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

1551.2.

At the initial appearance of a person arrested under Section 1551 or 1551.1, he shall be informed of the reason for his arrest and of his right to demand and procure counsel. If the person denies that he is the same person charged with or convicted of a crime in the other state, a hearing shall be held within 10 days to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that he is the same person and whether he is charged with or convicted of a crime in the other state. At the hearing, the magistrate shall accept a certified copy of an indictment found, an information, a verified complaint, a judgment or sentence, or other judicial proceedings against
 that person in the state in which the crime is charged or the conviction occurred, and such copy shall constitute conclusive proof of its contents. Witnesses from the other state shall not be required to be present at the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1551.3.

Immediately upon the arrest of the person charged, the magistrate must give notice thereof to the district attorney. The district attorney must immediately thereafter give notice to the executive authority of the State, or to the prosecuting attorney or presiding judge of the court of the city or county within the State having jurisdiction of the offense, to the end that a demand may be made for the arrest and surrender of the person charged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1552.

If at the hearing before the magistrate, it appears that the accused is the person charged with having committed the crime alleged, the magistrate must, by a warrant reciting the accusation, commit him to the county jail for such a time, not exceeding thirty days and specified in the warrant, as will enable the arrest of the accused to be made under a warrant of the Governor on a requisition of the executive authority of the State having jurisdiction of the offense, unless the accused give bail as provided in section 1552.1, or until he shall be legally discharged.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1552.1.

Unless the offense with which the prisoner is charged, is shown to be an offense punishable by death or life imprisonment under the laws of the state in which it was committed, or it is shown that the prisoner is alleged to have escaped or violated the terms of his parole following conviction of a crime punishable in the state of conviction by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, the magistrate may admit the person arrested to bail by bond or undertaking, with sufficient sureties, and in such sum as he deems proper, conditioned upon the appearance of such person before him at a time specified in such bond or undertaking, and for his surrender upon
 the warrant of the Governor of this state. Nothing in this section or in Section 1553 shall be deemed to prevent the immediate service of a Governor’s warrant issued under Section 1549.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1552.2.

If the accused is not arrested under warrant of the Governor by the expiration of the time specified in the warrant, bond, or undertaking, a magistrate may discharge him or may recommit him for a further period of 60 days. In the latter event a justice of the Supreme Court or court of appeal or a judge of the superior court may again take bail for his appearance and surrender, as provided in Section 1552.1 but within a period not to exceed 60 days after the date of such new bond or undertaking.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

1553.

If the prisoner is admitted to bail, and fails to appear and surrender himself according to the conditions of his bond, the magistrate, by proper order, shall declare the bond forfeited and order his immediate arrest without warrant if he be within this State. Recovery may be had on such bond in the name of the people of the State as in the case of other bonds or undertakings given by a defendant in criminal proceedings.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1553.1.

(a) If a criminal prosecution has been instituted against a person charged under Section 1551 under the laws of this state and is still pending, the Governor, with the consent of the Attorney General, may surrender the person on demand of the executive authority of another state or hold him or her until he or she has been tried and discharged or convicted and served his or her sentence in this state.

(b) If a criminal prosecution has been instituted under the laws of this state against a person charged under Section 1551, the restrictions on the length of commitment
 contained in Sections 1552 and 1552.2 shall not be applicable during the period that the criminal prosecution is pending in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1553.2.

The guilt or innocence of the accused as to the crime with which he is charged may not be inquired into by the Governor or in any proceeding after the demand for extradition accompanied by a charge of crime in legal form as above provided has been presented to the Governor, except as such inquiry may be involved in identifying the person held as the person charged with the crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1554.

The Governor may recall his warrant of arrest or may issue another warrant whenever he deems it proper.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1554.1.

Whenever the Governor of this State shall demand the return of a person charged with crime in this State or with escaping from confinement or violating the terms of his bail, probation or parole in this State, from the executive authority of any other State or of any foreign government or the chief justice or an associate justice of the Supreme Court of the District of Columbia authorized to receive such demand, he shall issue a warrant under the seal of this State to an agent, commanding him to receive the person so demanded and to convey him to the proper officer in the county in this State in which the offense was committed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1554.2.

(a) When the return to this state of a person charged with crime in this state is required, the district attorney shall present to the Governor his written application for a requisition for the return of the person charged. In such application there shall be stated the name of the person so charged, the crime charged against him, the approximate time, place and circumstances of its commission, and the state in which he is believed to be, including the location of the accused therein at the time the application is made. Such application shall certify that, in the opinion of the district attorney, the ends of justice require the
 arrest and return of the accused to this state for trial and that the proceeding is not instituted to enforce a private claim.

(b) When the return to this state is required of a person who has been convicted of a crime in this state and who has escaped from confinement or has violated the terms of his bail, probation or parole the district attorney of the county in which the offense was committed, the Board of Prison Terms, the Director of Corrections, the California Institution for Women, the Youth Authority, or the sheriff of the county from which escape from confinement was made, shall present to the Governor a written application for a requisition for the return of such person. In such application there shall be stated the name of the person, the crime of which he was convicted, the circumstances of his escape or of the violation of the terms of his bail, probation or parole, and the state in which he is believed to be, including the
 location of such person therein at the time application is made.

(c) The application shall be verified, shall be executed in duplicate, and shall be accompanied by two certified copies of the indictment, the information, or the verified complaint made to the magistrate stating the offense with which the accused is charged, or the judgment of conviction or the sentence. The officer or board requesting the requisition may also attach such affidavits and other documents in duplicate as are deemed proper to be submitted with such application. One copy of the application, with the action of the Governor indicated by endorsement thereon, and one of the certified copies of the indictment, verified complaint, information, or judgment of conviction or sentence shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. The other copies of all papers shall be forwarded with the Governor’s requisition.

(d) Upon receipt of an application under this section, the Governor or agent authorized in writing by the Governor whose authorization has been filed with the Secretary of State, may sign a requisition for the return of the person charged and any other document incidental to that requisition or to the return of the person charged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1554.3.

After a person has been brought back to this state by extradition proceedings, the person shall be committed to a county jail with bail set in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in addition to the amount of bail appearing on the warrant. A 48-hour noticed bail hearing, excluding weekends and holidays, is required to deviate from this prescribed bail amount. Nothing in this section is intended to preclude the application of subdivision (e) of Section 1270.1 to enhance
 the bail amount for the felony charge appearing on the warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 67, Sec. 1.   (SB 291)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1555.

A person brought into this State on, or after waiver of extradition based on a criminal charge shall not be subject to service of process in civil actions arising out of the same facts as the criminal proceedings for which he is returned, until he has been convicted in the criminal proceeding, or, if acquitted, until he has had reasonable opportunity to return to the State from which he was extradited.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1555.1.

Any person arrested in this state charged with having committed any crime in another state or alleged to have escaped from confinement, or broken the terms of his or her bail, probation or parole may waive the issuance and service of the Governor’s warrant provided for in this chapter and all other procedure incidental to extradition proceedings, by subscribing in the presence of a magistrate within this state a writing which states that he or she consents to return to the demanding state; provided, however, that before such waiver shall be subscribed by such person, the magistrate shall inform him or her of his or her rights to require the issuance and
 service of a warrant of extradition as provided in this chapter.

If such waiver is executed, it shall forthwith be forwarded to the office of the Governor of this state, and filed therein. The magistrate shall remand the person to custody without bail, unless otherwise stipulated by the district attorney with the concurrence of the other state, and shall direct the officer having such person in custody to deliver such person forthwith to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state, and shall deliver to such agent a copy of such waiver.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the rights of the accused person to return voluntarily and without formality to the demanding state, provided that state consents, nor shall this procedure of waiver be deemed to be an exclusive procedure or to limit the powers, rights or duties of the officers of the demanding state or of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1555.2.

(a) If the arrested person refuses to sign a waiver of extradition under Section 1555.1, a hearing shall be held, upon application of the district attorney, to determine whether the person is alleged to have violated the terms of his release within the past five years on bail or own recognizance while charged with a crime punishable in the charging state by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, or on probation or parole following conviction of a crime punishable in the state of conviction by imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, and whether, as a condition of that release, the person was required to waive extradition.

(b) At the hearing, the district attorney shall present a certified copy of the order from the other state conditionally releasing the person, including the condition that he was required to waive extradition together with a certified copy of the order from the other state directing the return of the person for violating the terms of his conditional release. The magistrate shall accept these certified copies as conclusive proof of their contents and shall presume the validity of the extradition waiver condition.

(c) If the magistrate finds that there is probable cause to believe that the arrested person is the same person named in the conditional release order and the order commanding his return, the magistrate shall forthwith issue an order remanding the person to custody without bail and directing the delivery of the person to duly accredited agents of the other state.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c), the district attorney may stipulate, with the concurrence of the other state, that the arrested person may be released on bail or own recognizance pending the arrival of duly accredited agents from the other state.

(e) If the arrested person or his counsel desires to test the legality of the order issued under subdivision (c), the magistrate shall fix a reasonable time to be allowed him within which to apply for a writ of habeas corpus. If the writ is denied and probable cause appears for an application for a writ of habeas corpus to another court, or justice or judge thereof, the order denying the writ shall fix a reasonable time within which the accused may again apply for a writ of habeas corpus. Unless otherwise stipulated pursuant to subdivision (d), the arrested person shall remain in custody without
 bail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

1555.3.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to constitute a waiver by this state of its right, power or privilege to try any demanded person for crime committed within this state, or of its right, power or privilege to regain custody of such person by extradition proceedings or otherwise for the purpose of trial, sentence or punishment for any crime committed within this state; nor shall any proceedings had under this chapter which result in, or fail to result in, extradition be deemed a waiver by this state of any of its rights, privileges or jurisdiction in any manner whatsoever.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1555.2 by Stats. 1983, Ch. 793, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

1556.

After a person has been brought back to this State by extradition proceedings, he may be tried in this State for other crimes which he may be charged with having committed in this State as well as for the crime or crimes specified in the requisition for his extradition.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1556.1.

The provisions of this chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purposes to make uniform the law of those states which enact legislation based upon the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1556.2.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

1557.

(a) This section shall apply when this state or a city, county, or city and county employs a person to travel to a foreign jurisdiction outside this state for the express purpose of returning a fugitive from justice to this state when the Governor of this state, in the exercise of the authority conferred by Section 2 of Article IV of the United States Constitution, or by the laws of this state, has demanded the surrender of the fugitive from the executive authority of any state of the United States, or of any foreign government.

(b) Upon the approval of the Governor, the Controller shall audit and pay out of the State Treasury as provided in subdivision (c) or (d) the accounts of the person employed to bring back the fugitive, including any money paid by that person
 for all of the following:

(1) Money paid to the authorities of a sister state for statutory fees in connection with the detention and surrender of the fugitive.

(2) Money paid to the authorities of the sister state for the subsistence of the fugitive while detained by the sister state without payment of which the authorities of the sister state refuse to surrender the fugitive.

(3) Where it is necessary to present witnesses or evidence in the sister state, without which the sister state would not surrender the fugitive, the cost of producing the witnesses or evidence in the sister state.

(4) Where the appearance of witnesses has been authorized in advance by the Governor, who may authorize the appearance in unusual cases where the interests of justice
 would be served, the cost of producing witnesses to appear in the sister state on behalf of the fugitive in opposition to his or her extradition.

(c) No amount shall be paid out of the State Treasury to a city, county, or city and county except as follows:

(1) When a warrant has been issued by any magistrate after the filing of a complaint or the finding of an indictment and its presentation to the court and filing by the clerk, and the person named therein as defendant is a fugitive from justice who has been found and arrested in any state of the United States or in any foreign government, the county auditor shall draw his or her warrant and the county treasurer shall pay to the person designated to return the fugitive, the amount of expenses estimated by the district attorney to be incurred in the return of the fugitive.

(2) If the person designated to return the fugitive is a city officer, the city officer authorized to draw warrants on the city treasury shall draw his or her warrant and the city treasurer shall pay to that person the amount of expenses estimated by the district attorney to be incurred in the return of the fugitive.

(3) The person designated to return the fugitive shall make no disbursements from any funds advanced without a receipt being obtained therefor showing the amount, the purpose for which the sum is expended, the place, the date, and to whom paid.

(4) A receipt obtained pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be filed by the person designated to return the fugitive with the county auditor or appropriate city officer or the Controller, as the case may be, together with an affidavit by the person that the expenditures represented by the receipts were necessarily made
 in the performance of duty, and when the advance has been made by the county or city treasurer to the person designated to return the fugitive, and has thereafter been audited by the Controller, the payment thereof shall be made by the State Treasurer to the county or city treasury that has advanced the funds.

(5) If the expenses of the person employed to bring back the fugitive are less than the amount advanced on the recommendation of the district attorney, the person employed to bring back the fugitive shall return to the county or city treasurer, as appropriate, the difference in amount between the aggregate amount of receipts so filed by him or her, and the amount advanced to the person upon the recommendation of the district attorney.

(6) When no advance has been made to the person designated to return the fugitive, the sums expended by him or her, when audited by the
 Controller, shall be paid by the State Treasurer to the person so designated.

(7) Any payments made out of the State Treasury pursuant to this section shall be made from appropriations for the fiscal year in which those payments are made.

(d) A city, county, or other jurisdiction shall not file, and the state shall not reimburse, a claim pursuant to this section that is presented to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or to any other agency or department of the state more than six months after the close of the month in which the costs were incurred. Notwithstanding any other law, a person transporting a fugitive as authorized by the Governor pursuant to this section shall be reimbursed according to the rates in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive. Rates and rules for reimbursement of travel claims not specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, shall be consistent
 with the rules of the Department of General Services.

(1) Reimbursement for breakfast is up to four dollars ($4).

(2) Reimbursement for lunch is up to seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($7.25).

(3) Reimbursement for dinner is up to twelve dollars ($12).

(4) Reimbursement for incidental expenses is up to three dollars and seventy-five cents ($3.75).

(5) Reimbursement for a meal for a prisoner, patient, ward, or fugitive is up to the amounts specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 36.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1558.

No compensation, fee, profit, or reward of any kind can be paid to or received by a public officer of this state, a corporation or firm, or other person, for a service rendered in procuring from the Governor the demand mentioned in Section 1557, or the surrender of the fugitive, or for conveying him or her to this state, or detaining him or her therein, except as provided for in that section. Every person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Miscellaneous Provisions Respecting Special Proceedings of a Criminal Nature [1562. - 1564.]

1562.

The party prosecuting a special proceeding of a criminal nature is designated in this Code as the complainant, and the adverse party as the defendant.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1563.

The provisions of Section 1401, in respect to entitling affidavits, are applicable to such proceedings.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1564.

The Courts and magistrates before whom such proceedings are prosecuted may issue subpoenas for witnesses, and punish their disobedience in the same manner as in a criminal action.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 13. PROCEEDINGS FOR BRINGING PERSONS IMPRISONED IN THE STATE PRISON, OR THE JAIL OF ANOTHER COUNTY, BEFORE A COURT [1567. - 1567.]

1567.

When it is necessary to have a person imprisoned in the state prison brought before any court, or a person imprisoned in a county jail brought before a court sitting in another county, an order for that purpose may be made by the court and executed by the sheriff of the county where it is made. The order shall be signed by the judge or magistrate and sealed with the seal of the court, if any. The order shall be to the following effect:

County of ____ (as the case may be).

The people of the State of California to the warden of ____ (or sheriff of ____, as the case may be):

An order having been made this day by me, that A.B. be produced in this court as witness in the case of ____, you are commanded to deliver him or her into the custody of ____.

Dated this ____ day of ____, 19__.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 334.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 15. OUTPATIENT STATUS FOR MENTALLY DISORDERED AND DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED OFFENDERS [1600. - 1620.]

1600.

Any person committed to a state hospital or other treatment facility under the provisions of Section 1026, or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of this code, or Section 6316 or 6321 of the Welfare and Institutions Code may be placed on outpatient status from that commitment subject to the procedures and provisions of this title, except that a developmentally disabled person may be placed on outpatient status from that commitment under the provisions of this title as modified by Section 1370.4. Any person committed as a sexually violent predator under the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code may be placed on outpatient status from that commitment in accordance with the procedures described in Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 462, Sec. 1.   Effective September 13, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1600.5.

For a person committed as a mentally disordered sex offender under former Section 6316 or 6316.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or committed pursuant to Section 1026 or 1026.5, or committed pursuant to Section 2972, who is placed on outpatient status under the provisions of this title, time spent on outpatient status, except when placed in a locked facility at the direction of the outpatient supervisor, shall not count as actual custody and shall not be credited toward the person’s maximum term of commitment or toward the person’s term of extended commitment. Nothing in this section shall be construed to extend the maximum period of parole of a mentally disordered offender.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 324, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.

(a) When a person charged with and found incompetent on a charge of, convicted of, or found not guilty by reason of insanity of murder, mayhem, aggravated mayhem, a violation of Section 207, 209, or 209.5 in which the victim suffers intentionally inflicted great bodily injury, robbery or carjacking with a deadly or dangerous weapon or in which the victim suffers great bodily injury, a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 451, a violation of paragraph (2), (3), or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, a violation of paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262, a violation of Section 459 in the first degree, a violation of Section 220 in which the victim suffers great bodily injury, a violation of Section 288, a violation of Section 18715, 18725, 18740, 18745, 18750, or 18755, or any felony involving
 death, great bodily injury, or an act which poses a serious threat of bodily harm to another person, outpatient status under this title shall not be available until that person has actually been confined in a state hospital or other treatment facility for 180 days or more after having been committed under the provisions of law specified in Section 1600, unless the court finds a suitable placement, including, but not limited to, an outpatient placement program, that would provide the person with more appropriate mental health treatment and the court finds that the placement would not pose a danger to the health or safety of others, including, but not limited to, the safety of the victim and the victim’s family.

(b) When a person charged with, and found incompetent on a charge of, or convicted of, any misdemeanor or any felony other than those described in subdivision (a), or found not guilty of any misdemeanor by reason of insanity, outpatient
 status under this title may be granted by the court prior to actual confinement in a state hospital or other treatment facility under the provisions of law specified in Section 1600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 56.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1602.

(a) Before any person subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 1601 may be placed on outpatient status, the court shall consider all of the following criteria:

(1) In the case of a person who is an inpatient, whether the medical director or designee of the state hospital or other treatment facility to which the person has been committed advises the
 committing court, defense counsel, and the prosecutor that the defendant would no longer be a danger to the health and safety of others, or to themselves, while under supervision and treatment in the community, and would benefit from such outpatient status.

(2) In all cases, whether the community program director or a designee, or
 the independent placement panel, advises the court that the defendant will not be a danger to the health and safety of others, or to themselves, while on outpatient status, will benefit from such status, and identifies an appropriate program of supervision and treatment.

(b) Prior to determining whether to place the person on outpatient status, the court shall provide actual notice to the prosecutor and defense counsel, and to the victim, and shall hold a hearing at which the court may specifically order outpatient status for the
 person.

(c) The community program director or a designee, or the independent placement panel, shall prepare and submit the evaluation and the treatment plan specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to the court within 15 calendar days after notification by the court to do so, except that in the case of a person who is an inpatient, the evaluation and treatment plan shall be submitted within 30 calendar days after notification by the court to do so.

(d) Any evaluations and recommendations pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall include review and consideration of complete, available information regarding the circumstances of the criminal offense and the
 person’s prior criminal history.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 59.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1603.

(a) Before any person subject to subdivision (a) of Section 1601 may be placed on outpatient status the court shall consider all of the following criteria:

(1) Whether the medical director or designee of the state hospital or other treatment facility to which the person has been committed advises the committing court, defense counsel, and the prosecutor that
 the defendant would no longer be a danger to the health and safety of others, including themselves, while under supervision and treatment in the community, will benefit from that status, and identifies an appropriate program of supervision and treatment.

(2) Whether the community program director or a designee, or pursuant to Section 4360.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the independent
 placement panel, advises the
 committing court, defense counsel, and the prosecutor that the defendant would no longer be a danger to the health and safety of others, including themselves, while under supervision and treatment in the community, will benefit from that status, and identifies an appropriate program of supervision and treatment.
